Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

11-109-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Act as a fiduciary" or "acting as a fiduciary" means to:

Accept or execute trusts, including to:

Act as trustee under a written agreement;

Receive money or other property in the capacity as trustee for investment in real or personal property;

Act as trustee and perform the fiduciary duties committed or transferred to the trustee by order of a court of competent jurisdiction;

Act as personal representative or trustee of the estate of a deceased person; or

Act as trustee for a minor or incapacitated person;

Administer real or tangible personal property in any other fiduciary capacity; or

Act pursuant to an order of a court of competent jurisdiction as personal representative, executor, or administrator of the estate of a deceased person or as a guardian or conservator for a minor or incapacitated person.

"Banking board" shall have the same meaning as defined in section 11-101-401 (7).

"Commissioner" means the state bank commissioner.

"Order" means all or any part of the final disposition, whether affirmative, negative, injunctive, or declaratory in form, by the banking board of any matter other than the making of rules of general application.

"Person" means an individual, corporation, partnership, joint venture, unincorporated association, or any other legal or commercial entity.

"Representative trust office" means an office at which a trust company has been authorized by the banking board to engage in a trust business other than acting as a fiduciary.

"Savings deposit" means a deposit or account with respect to which the depositor is not required by the deposit contract, but may at any time be required by the trust company, to give written notice of an intended withdrawal not less than seven days before withdrawal is made, and that is not payable on a specified date or at the expiration of a specified time after the date of deposit, and funds deposited to the credit of, or in which any beneficial interest is held by, a corporation, association, partnership, or other organization operated for profit do not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars per depositor at the trust company.

"Time deposit" means a deposit that the depositor does not have a right to withdraw for a period of seven days or more from the date of deposit. A "time deposit" may be represented by a transferable or nontransferable, or a negotiable or nonnegotiable, certificate, instrument, passbook, statement, or otherwise.

"Transaction account" means a deposit or account that the depositor or account holder may withdraw by check or by similar means for payment to third parties.

"Trust business" means the holding out by a person to the public by advertising, solicitation, or other means that the person is available to perform any service authorized pursuant to section 11-109-201, including acting as a fiduciary.

"Trust company" means a corporation organized pursuant to and subject to regulation by the provisions of this article.

"Trust institution" means a trust company, a federal or state chartered bank with trust powers, a state bank with trust powers chartered under the laws of another state, or a trust company chartered under the laws of another state.

"Trust office" means an office, other than the principal office, at which a trust company is authorized by the banking board to engage in the trust business and to act as a fiduciary.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1175, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(6) and (12) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1482, § 48, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-102 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-102. Use of words "trust" or "trust company".

It is unlawful for any person, firm, association, or corporation to use or advertise the words "trust" or "trust company" in the conduct of its business in such a manner as is likely to cause the public to be confused, deceived, or mistaken that the person, firm, association, or corporation has been authorized to transact business as a regulated financial institution unless the person, firm, association, or corporation is organized under the "Colorado Banking Code", articles 101 to 109 of this title, article 70 of this title, the banking laws of another state, or the national banking laws and is authorized to use the words "trust" or "trust company" as part of its name.

Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to trust institutions.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1177, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1482, § 49, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-102.3 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-103. Applicability of powers of banking board and bank commissioner to trust companies.

The powers, duties, and functions of the banking board and the commissioner contained in article 102 of this title and the declaration of policy contained in section 11-101-102 shall apply to the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1177, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-102.5 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-104. Powers - banking board - commissioner.

In addition to the other powers conferred on the banking board by this article, the banking board shall have the power to:

Implement by order and rule any provision of this article and to obtain restraining orders and injunctions to prevent violation of and to enforce compliance with the provisions of this article and the orders and rules issued thereunder. In the exercise of the power to make orders and issue rules, the banking board shall act in the interests of maintaining sound trust companies and the security of fiduciary funds.

Regulate the procedure and the practice at hearings;

Order any person or a trust company to cease violating any provision of this article or any rule and to mail a copy of the order to the person or trust company and to each director of the trust company;

Suspend, after notice and hearing, any officer or director for fraud, theft, or failure to comply with the provisions of this article or with any valid order or rule;

Subpoena witnesses, require the production of evidence, administer oaths, and examine any person under oath in connection with any matter relating to the powers and duties of the banking board;

Require that each trust company maintain such insurance and bonds as necessary and appropriate;

Approve amendments to a trust company's articles of incorporation;

Approve or disapprove a change of location;

Approve or disapprove any merger or other corporate reorganization;

Require a trust company holding fiduciary funds pursuant to section 11-109-906 to collateralize such funds as are in excess of federally insured amounts in accordance with the rules adopted by the banking board;

Require that a trust company that is accepting deposits pursuant to section 11-109-201 (1)(d) limit the aggregate amount of such deposits.

If the banking board has reason to believe that the capital of any trust company is inadequate under the rules of the banking board, the banking board may ascertain the facts and furnish the trust company with a copy of its determination. If the banking board finds an inadequacy of capital based upon such determination, the commissioner, with the approval of the banking board, may direct the trust company to levy an assessment in a designated amount upon the holders of record of common stock to remedy the inadequacy of capital. Upon receipt of an order to levy an assessment, the directors shall cause to be sent to all holders of common stock, at their addresses, a copy of the order and a copy of this subsection (2). If an assessment is not paid within the time prescribed in the order or such shorter period as the directors decide, but not less than thirty days, the trust company may, within sixty days thereafter as the banking board may prescribe in its order, offer the shares of the defaulting stockholders for sale at public auction or private sale at a price that shall not be less than the amount of the assessment and the cost of the sale. Any excess shall be paid to the prior owners. The method of collection provided in this subsection (2) shall be the sole method of collecting assessments. If an assessment is not paid within ninety days after the date of the order to levy or at such other date as may be specified in the order, but in no event less than thirty days, the commissioner may, with the approval of the banking board, proceed pursuant to section 11-109-702. However, for good cause shown to the banking board by the affected trust company, the banking board may extend the ninety-day limit.

The term "shareholder" shall apply not only to such persons as appear on the books of the trust company as shareholders, but also to every owner of stock, legal or equitable, although the stock may stand on such books in the name of another person, but not to a person that holds the stock as collateral security for the payment of a debt.

Any trust company shareholder that has transferred such shareholder's shares, caused such transfer to appear on the books of the trust company within sixty days before the capital inadequacy of such trust company, or that has made such transfer with knowledge of such impending capital inadequacy shall be liable to the same extent that the transferee or subsequent transferee fails to meet such liability. This section shall not be construed to affect in any way any recourse that such shareholder might otherwise have against those in whose names such shares appear upon the books of the trust company at the time of such capital inadequacy.

No stockholder of a trust company shall set off against the stockholder's liability any claim such stockholder may have as a depositor in or creditor of any insolvent trust company.

The commissioner shall examine the books and records of every trust company as often as deemed advisable and to the extent required by the banking board; shall make and file a correct report in detail disclosing the results of such examination; and shall mail a copy of such report to the trust company examined.

The commissioner shall examine, as often as deemed advisable and to the extent required by the banking board, any electronic data processing centers of a trust company or any electronic data processing centers that serve a trust company, without regard to the location of the electronic data processing center; shall make and file in the commissioner's office a correct report in detail disclosing the results of such examination; and shall mail a copy of such report to the data processing centers examined and the trust company that they serve.

The commissioner, if he or she deems it necessary or if required by the banking board, may examine the books and records of the controlling shareholder of a trust company and any affiliated entities of the controlling shareholder for the purpose of determining the safety and soundness of the trust company. If the controlling shareholder or affiliate's records are located outside this state, the controlling shareholder or affiliate shall either make them available to the commissioner at a convenient location within this state or pay the reasonable and necessary expenses for the commissioner or the commissioner's representative to examine them at the place where they are located. The commissioner may designate representatives, including comparable officials of the state in which the records are located, to inspect them on the commissioner's behalf. If a controlling shareholder or affiliate refuses to permit the commissioner to make an examination, the banking board may fine such controlling shareholder or affiliate an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars for each day any such refusal continues. In lieu of any examination required by this subsection (8), the commissioner may accept an audit for the previous fiscal year prepared by an independent certified public accountant, independent registered accountant, or other independent qualified person. If the commissioner accepts an audit prepared by such independent person, no costs thereof shall be borne by the commissioner and all costs of such audit shall remain the obligation of the controlling shareholder or affiliate.

For purposes of this subsection (8):

"Affiliated entity" or "affiliate" means an entity in control of a controlling shareholder.

"Controlling shareholder" means a shareholder in control of a trust company.

"In control of" means that an entity or shareholder meets the same criteria for acquiring control as is set forth in section 11-102-303 for acquiring control of a state bank.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1177, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-117 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-105. No private right of action.

Except as expressly provided in this article, no person, other than the banking board, shall have the right to bring or maintain any private action, at law or in equity, for a violation of or to enforce this article.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1180, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-125 as it existed prior to 2003.